Utah statutes.
4-34-1.   Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter:

(1)  "Agricultural product" means any fowl, animal, fish, vegetable, or other product or article, fresh or processed, which is customary food, or which is proper food for human consumption.

(2)  "Nonprofit charitable organization" means any organization which was organized and is operating for charitable purposes and which meets the requirements of the Internal Revenue Service of the U.S. Department of Treasury that exempt the organization from income taxation under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code.

(3)  "Gleaner" means a person who harvests, for free distribution, an agricultural crop that has been donated by the owner.



Enacted by Chapter 70, 1981 General Session

